Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-139
Traffic; sales; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power by ordinance to regulate traffic and sales upon the streets, the sidewalks, and other public places.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5033;

C.S.1922, § 4202;

C.S.1929, § 17-141;

R.S.1943, § 17-139;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 31.

The power of municipalities, under this section, to define and punish the offense of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, is not limited by the Uniform Motor Vehicle Act. Gembler v. City of Seward, 136 Neb. 196, 285 N.W. 542 (1939), modified on rehearing 136 Neb. 916, 288 N.W. 545 (1939).